Utah statutes.
75-6-202.   Direction to pay taxes in trust or other dispositive instrument.
A general direction in a trust or other dispositive instrument to pay all
taxes imposed as a result of a decedent's death or similar language shall not
be construed to include taxes imposed on a "generation skipping transfer"
under Section 2601 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (or any successor or
amended section of similar content) unless the trustor of the trust or creator
of the other dispositive instrument shall express an intention that these
taxes be paid out of the property which is subject to the trust or other
dispositive instrument by reference to the generation skipping tax or
otherwise.
